Louisiana, session 2026, HB516.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:866(A)(1), (C), and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§866. Compulsory motor vehicle liability security; failure to comply; limitation of
damages
A.(1) There shall be no recovery for the first one hundred fifteen thousand
dollars of bodily injury and no recovery for the first one hundred fifteen thousand
dollars of property damage based on any cause or right of action arising out of a
motor vehicle accident, for such injury or damages occasioned by an owner or
operator of a motor vehicle involved in such an accident who fails to own or
maintain compulsory motor vehicle liability security.
* * *
C. If the owner of a motor vehicle, who fails to own or maintain compulsory
motor vehicle liability security, institutes an action to recover damages in any
amount, regardless of whether such owner or operator is at fault, and is awarded an
amount equal to or less than one hundred fifteen thousand dollars of bodily injury,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1130 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 516
then such owner or operator shall be assessed and held liable for all court costs
incurred by all parties to the action.
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no insurer shall
lose any rights of subrogation for claims paid under the applicable insurance policy
for the recovery of any sum in excess of the first one hundred fifteen thousand
dollars of bodily injury and the first one hundred fifteen thousand dollars of property
damages.
(2) In claims where no suit is filed, the claimant's insurer shall have all rights
to recover any amount paid by the claimant's insurer on behalf of the insured for the
recovery of any sum in excess of the first one hundred fifteen thousand dollars of
bodily injury and the first one hundred fifteen thousand dollars of property damages.
* * *